Indiana, session 2026, SB293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-26-13-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2022,
SECTION 57, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10. (a) An applicant for registration as a
pharmacist intern must furnish proof satisfactory to the board that the
applicant:
(1) is actively enrolled in a school of pharmacy accredited by the
American Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education;
(2) has obtained the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination
Committee Certificate; or
(3) is a qualified applicant awaiting the examination for licensure
as a pharmacist.
(b) A registration issued under subsection (a) is valid for one (1)
year and may be renewed by the board in accordance with subsection
(c) until the expiration date established by the Indiana professional
licensing agency under IC 25-1-5-4.
(c) An application for registration or renewal must be accompanied
by the appropriate fee and one (1) of the following:
(1) Proof of having obtained the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate
Examination Committee Certificate.
(2) Proof of active enrollment in a school of pharmacy accredited
by the American Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education.
SEA 293 — Concur

2
SECTION 2. IC 25-26-13-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2022,
SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) To be eligible for licensure as a
pharmacist, an individual must file such evidence as is required by the
board that:
(1) the individual is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) the individual does not have a conviction for a crime that has
a direct bearing on the individual's ability to practice competently;
(3) the individual:
(A) has graduated with a professional degree from a school of
pharmacy located in the United States or Canada that is
accredited by the American Accreditation Council for
Pharmacy Education or the Canadian Council for
Accreditation of Pharmacy Programs and approved by the
board; or
(B) has:
(i) graduated with a professional degree from a school of
pharmacy located outside the United States and Canada; and
(ii) met the requirements under subsection (c); and
(4) the individual has satisfactorily completed a pharmacist intern
program approved by the board; and
(5) the individual has successfully passed the North American
Pharmacist Licensure Examination administered by the
National Association of Boards of Pharmacy.
(b) An applicant who has graduated with a professional degree from
a school of pharmacy accredited by the Canadian Council for
Accreditation of Pharmacy Programs and approved by the board must
obtain the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee
Certificate administered by the National Association of Boards of
Pharmacy before taking the examination required under subsection (d).
(a)(5).
(c) An applicant who has graduated with a professional degree from
a school of pharmacy located outside the United States and Canada
must do the following:
(1) Provide the board with verification of the applicant's academic
record and graduation.
(2) Obtain the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination
Committee Certificate administered by the National Association
of Boards of Pharmacy.
(d) After filing an application on a form provided by the board and
submitting the information required in subsection (a), and successfully
completing the examination administered by the board, the applicant
SEA 293 — Concur

3
may be licensed as a pharmacist.
SECTION 3. IC 25-26-13-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2022,
SECTION 59, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 12. (a) An individual who is licensed as a
pharmacist in another state where the requirements for licensure were
not less than those required in this state at the time of original licensure
may be issued a license in this state if:
(1) the individual has registered with and been approved by the
National Association of Boards of Pharmacy; and
(2) the individual has graduated with a professional degree in
pharmacy from a school of pharmacy accredited by the American
Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education or the Canadian
Council for Accreditation of Pharmacy Programs and approved by
the board. and
(3) the individual has successfully completed an examination
administered by the board concerning the federal statutes and
regulations and the Indiana statutes and rules governing the
practice of pharmacy.
(b) An individual who has a professional pharmacy degree from a
school of pharmacy located outside the United States and Canada and
who is licensed in another state where the requirements for licensure
are substantially the same as those in this state may be issued a license
under this chapter if:
(1) the individual has registered with and been approved by the
National Association of Boards of Pharmacy; and
(2) the individual has provided the board with proof of the
applicant's:
(A) academic record and graduation with a professional degree
from a school of pharmacy; and
(B) completion of the requirements for obtaining a Foreign
Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee Certificate
administered by the National Association of Boards of
Pharmacy. and
(3) the individual has successfully completed an examination
administered by the board concerning the federal statutes and
regulations and the Indiana statutes and rules governing the
practice of pharmacy.
SECTION 4. IC 25-26-13.5-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2022,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9. (a) There must be at least one (1)
pharmacist working at a remote dispensing facility for every six (6)
pharmacist interns, licensed pharmacy technicians, and pharmacy
SEA 293 — Concur

4
technicians in training at the supervising pharmacy and remote
dispensing facility. However, an individual whose only duty is to act as
the cashier is not included in the number of employees that may work
for one (1) pharmacist under this subsection.
(b) A remote dispensing facility that is not staffed by a pharmacist
must be staffed by at least one (1) pharmacy technician who meets the
following requirements:
(1) Is licensed under IC 25-26-19.
(2) Has at least two thousand (2,000) hours of experience working
as a pharmacy technician in a pharmacy licensed under this article
and under the direct supervision of a pharmacist.
(3) Has successfully passed a certification examination offered by
the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board or another
nationally recognized certification body approved by the board.
(4) If the remote dispensing facility is located in a hospital or
physician clinic setting, either:
(A) has graduated from a pharmacy technician training
program accredited by the American Accreditation Council
for Pharmacy Education or the American Society of Health
System Pharmacists; or
(B) obtained the hours described in subdivision (2) before July
1, 2017.
(5) Is supervised by a pharmacist at the supervising pharmacy at
all times that the remote dispensing facility is operational. As
used in this subdivision, supervision does not require that the
pharmacist be physically present at the remote dispensing facility
as long as the pharmacist is supervising telepharmacy operations
electronically through a computer link, video link, and audio link.
(6) Is currently in good standing with the board.
(c) A pharmacy technician in training may not work at a remote
dispensing facility unless a pharmacist is on site.
(d) The board shall adopt rules that require pharmacy technicians
working at a remote dispensing facility that is not staffed by a
pharmacist to complete continuing education requirements established
by the board.
SECTION 5. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) 856 IAC 1-3.1-1
is void. The publisher of the Indiana Administrative Code and the
Indiana Register shall remove this section from the Indiana
Administrative Code.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 6. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The Indiana
board of pharmacy shall amend 856 IAC 1-4-1 to conform to
SEA 293 — Concur

5
IC 25-26-13-12, as amended by this act.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 7. An emergency is declared for this act.
SEA 293 — Concur

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 293 — Concur